Louisiana, session 2026, SB305.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3138.2 and 3138.13(C) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3138.2. Degree program and career alignment transparency; postsecondary
workforce outcomes dashboard
A. The Board of Regents, in collaboration with postsecondary education
management boards, Louisiana Works and other relevant state agencies, shall
develop, maintain, and make publicly available a statewide dashboard or series
of dashboards that provide information on the alignment between
postsecondary degree programs and workforce outcomes in Louisiana.
B. The dashboard or dashboards shall be designed to assist in the
following:
(1) Prospective and current students and their families in understanding
career outcomes associated with degree programs.
(2) Policymakers and state agencies in evaluating postsecondary
program alignment with workforce needs.
(3) Postsecondary institutions in strengthening program design and labor
market relevance.
C. To the extent permitted by state and federal law, the dashboard or
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 305 ENROLLED
dashboards may include but shall not be limited to the following information,
disaggregated as appropriate:
(1) Degree program completion data.
(2) Employment outcomes following completion, including industry and
occupational placement.
(3) Median and range of wages at defined intervals following completion.
(4) Alignment of degree programs with high-demand or priority
occupations as identified by the state.
(5) Additional indicators determined by the Board of Regents to be
relevant to career alignment and economic development.
D. The Board of Regents shall ensure that the dashboard or dashboards
are updated on a regular basis, use consistent and clearly defined metrics, and
present information in a manner that is accessible and understandable to the
general public.
E. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to:
(1) Require the disclosure of personally identifiable information.
(2) Create performance funding requirements or mandates for
postsecondary institutions.
(3) Limit institutional autonomy over curriculum or academic
programming.
F. The Board of Regents may adopt rules and enter into data-sharing
agreements as necessary to implement this Section, subject to applicable state
and federal privacy laws.
* * *
§3138.13. Return on investment analysis; industry-based credentials
* * *
C. The Board of Regents and Louisiana Works shall develop procedures
to collect and analyze data on work-based learning through experiences such as
internships, cooperative education programs, apprenticeships, or other similar
forms of work-based learning. The data collected on work-based learning
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 305 ENROLLED
experiences may include whether the experience is paid or unpaid, the duration
of the placement, and whether the placement is part of a registered or
credential-aligned program. Any procedures developed by the Board of Regents
and Louisiana Works shall ensure the collection and analysis of data necessary
to encourage and capture any work-based learning credits an individual may
have earned and the appropriate manner in which such credits may be
awarded.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.